North Dakota, session 69, HB1002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the
secretary of state for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the secretary of state and public printing,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
SECRETARY OF STATE
Subdivision 1.
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $6,366,407 $587,108 $6,953,515
New and vacant FTE pool 0 148,177 148,177
Operating expenses 4,984,331 2,171,051 7,155,382
Grants 25,000 0 25,000
Petition review 8,000 0 8,000
Election reform 4,830,808 4,397,006 9,227,814
Total all funds $16,214,546 $7,303,342 $23,517,888
Less other funds 9,344,171 4,732,898 14,077,069
Total general fund $6,870,375 $2,570,444 $9,440,819
Full-time equivalent positions 35.00 (2.00) 33.00
Subdivision 2.
SECRETARY OF STATE - PUBLIC PRINTING
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Public printing $271,335 ($271,335) $0
Total general fund $271,335 ($271,335) $0
Subdivision 3
TOTAL - SECTION 1
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Grand total all funds $16,485,881 $7,032,007 $23,517,888
Grand total other funds 9,344,171 4,732,898 14,077,069
Grand total general fund $7,141,710 $2,299,109 $9,440,819
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO THE
SEVENTIETH LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items
included in the appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget

H. B. NO. 1002 - PAGE 2
for the 2027-29 biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the
seventieth legislative assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One - Time Funding Description Other Funds
Election pollpads and cradle points $2,800,000
Information technology enhancements 700,000
Election security grant 100,359
Help America Vote Act 1,000,000
Total other funds $4,600,359
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The
secretary of state may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line item in
section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the
new and vacant FTE pool line item to the salaries and wages line item in accordance with the
guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-ninth
legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
other funds line item in section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $3,500,000 from the strategic
investment and improvements fund for election pollpad and cradle points replacement and information
technology system enhancements for the secretary of state.
SECTION 5. TRANSFER - GENERAL FUND - ELECTION FUND. The office of management and
budget may transfer up to $600,000 from the general fund, appropriated in the election reform line item
in section 1 of this Act, to the election fund to match federal funds received by the state, as requested
by the secretary of state, during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 46-03-11 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
46-03-11. Publication of session laws and pocket supplements.
The secretary of state and the legislative council shall correct ministerial or clerical errors and
supervise the publication of the session laws and pocket part supplements to this code in a manner and
form prescribed by the legislative council, correlating each year's laws with this code.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 46-04-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
46-04-01. Official distribution of state laws - Secretary of stateLegislative council to control.
Each member of the legislative assembly and each, constitutional officer of the state, and each
judge of the supreme and district courts for the use of their respective offices and departments is
entitled to receive from the state a copy of any publication of the laws of the state and of any
compilation or codification thereofof the laws of the state published under authority of the state. The
district court in every county in the state is entitled to a copy of suchthe publications. The codification of
laws of the state received by each member of the legislative assembly is subject to section 54-03-23.
The secretary of statelegislative council shall designate other offices and agencies of the state that are
entitled to receive copies of any sucha publication of the laws for the use of suchthe state offices and
agencies and also shall determine the number of copies of any publication to be received by any
recipient in a distribution under the provisions of this section, if more than one copy is needed by
suchthe recipient for official use. All agencies that are funded entirely from special state funds or federal
funds must be charged for the actual cost of each copy of suchthe publications that the agency
requests.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 46-04-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

H. B. NO. 1002 - PAGE 3
46-04-03. Distribution of session laws, compilations, and codifications by secretary of
statelegislative council.
The secretary of state, as soon as conveniently can be done afterlegislative council shall distribute
as provided in sections 46 - 04 - 01 and 46 - 04 - 02 the publication of any session laws, compilations, or
codifications, shall cause copies thereof to be distributed as provided in sections 46-04-01 and
46-04-02and copies of those documents, as soon as practicable. The secretary of state, in
addition,legislative council shall furnish to the legislative assembly such additional copies as are
necessary upon resolution of the respective branches or committees thereofof the legislative assembly
and shall furnish to each member of the legislative assembly, upon demand thereforrequest, such
current volumes of laws as have not been obtained by the member through service in previous
sessions.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 46-04-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
46-04-04. Session laws, compilations, and codifications remain property of state.
Except as otherwise provided by law, each copy of laws, compilations, or codifications furnished to
any officer, department, or agency of the state, or to the legislative assembly, its officers, or committees
is and must remain the property of the state and must be surrendered to the secretary of statelegislative
council or to the recipient's successor in office.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 46-04-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
46-04-10. Duties of secretary of statelegislative council - Exchange of laws with other states.
The secretary of statelegislative council may distribute copies of all laws passed by each legislative
assembly and all compilations or codifications of the same, whenever it seems desirablelaws passed by
each legislative assembly:
1. In exchange for like publications of other states.
2. To replace copies lost or damaged in official use.
3. To provide copies as needed to state officers, boards, commissions, institutions, or agencies
of the state.
4. To provide copies as needed to the national conference of commissioners on uniform state
laws.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Section 46-04-14 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
46-04-14. Secretary of stateLegislative council to forward laws to counties.
As soon as the laws of each session of the legislative assembly are printed and ready for
distribution, the secretary of statelegislative council shall forward thosethe laws to which each county is
entitled to the county auditor of the county.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Section 46-04-18 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
46-04-18. Secretary of stateLegislative council to sell certain laws.
During the biennium immediately after publication, the secretary of statelegislative council mustshall
sell copies of the session laws for the cost of publication and handling plus ten percent. In subsequent
bienniums, the secretary of statelegislative council may determine and set a price for the copies of the

H. B. NO. 1002 - PAGE 4
session laws not sold in the biennium immediately after their publication. The price set should maximize
the recovery of the cost of publication and handling and minimize the number of volumes subject to
disposal under section 46-04-19. All moneys received under the provisions of this section must be paid
over to the state treasurer and credited to the general fund.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Section 46-04-19 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
46-04-19. Secretary of stateLegislative council may dispose of laws.
The secretary of statelegislative council may dispose of all volumes of the laws that are ten or more
years old, except one volume of each that, which must be retained for historical purposes.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Section 54-09-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-09-05. Salary of secretary of state.
The annual salary of the secretary of state is one hundred thirty thousand dollars through June 30,
2024, and one hundred thirty-five thousand two hundred dollars one hundred thirty - nine thousand two
hundred fifty - six dollars though June 30, 2026, and one hundred forty - three thousand four hundred
thirty - four dollars thereafter.
SECTION 15. EXEMPTION - STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND. The amount of $6,000,000
appropriated from federal funds derived from the state fiscal recovery fund for the purposes of an
election management system and to upgrade FirstStop in section 1 of chapter 34 of the 2023 Session
Laws is not subject to section 54-44.1-11 and any unexpended funds from these projects are available
to the secretary of state for costs relating to an election management system and to upgrade FirstStop
during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 16. EXEMPTION - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
amount of $1,500,000 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for the
purposes of a new campaign system, contracted website redesign, and information technology
enhancements in section 1 of chapter 34 of the 2023 Session Laws is not subject to section 54-44.1-11
and any unexpended funds from these projects are available to the secretary of state for costs relating
to a new campaign system, contracted website redesign, and information technology enhancements
during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.

H. B. NO. 1002 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1002.
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 1 Absent 7
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State